Vermont, session 2025-2026, H525.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 4212 is added to read:
§ 4212. COVERAGE FOR MOTOR VEHICLE GLASS
(a) A policy of motor vehicle insurance that provides comprehensive
coverage, whether designated as such or included within a broader coverage,
shall provide complete coverage for the repair or replacement of damaged
motor vehicle glass when a claim is for motor vehicle glass only, and such
claim shall not be subject to any deductible or minimum amount.
VT LEG #384976 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.525
2026 Page 2 of 2
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Advanced driver assistance system” means any motor vehicle
electronic safety system, as outlined in the most recent version of SAE
International’s SAE J3016 Levels of Driving Automation, that is designed to
support the driver and motor vehicle in a manner intended to:
(A) increase motor vehicle safety; and
(B) reduce losses associated with motor vehicle crashes.
(2) “Motor vehicle glass” means the glass and nonglass parts associated
with the replacement of the glass used in the windshield, doors, or windows of
a motor vehicle.
(3) “Repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass” includes:
(A) inspecting, repairing, restoring, or replacing damaged motor
vehicle glass; and
(B) calibrating or recalibrating an advanced driver assistance system
when an incident requires the replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass.
Sec. 2. APPLICATION
Sec. 1 of this act shall apply to all policies and contracts offered, issued, or
renewed on or after October 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #384976 v.2